ko: 스웨이 바 장착 위치(전륜/후륜/키트): 전면; 전면 및 후면 키트; 지정되지 않음; 후면; 기타
hu: Kanyarstabilizátor beépítési pozíciója (első/hátsó/csomag): Első; Első és hátsó készlet; Nincs megadva; Hátsó; Egyéb
fi: Kallistuksenvakaimen asennus (etu/taka/pakkaus): Etu; Etu- ja takasarja; Ei määritetty; Taka; Muu
pt-PT: Compatibilidade da barra estabilizadora (frente/traseira/kit): Frente; Kit dianteiro e traseiro; Não especificado; Traseira; Outro
pl: Montaż drążka stabilizatora (przód/tył/zestaw): Przód; Zestaw na przód i tył; Nie określono; Tył; Inny
ro-RO: Compatibilitate/montare bară stabilizatoare (față/spate/kit): Față; Kit față și spate; Nespecificat; Spate; Altele
de: Einbauposition des Stabilisators (vorn/hinten/Set): Vorne; Set für vorne und hinten; Nicht angegeben; Hinten; Sonstige
nb: Montering av dreiestabilisator (foran/bak/sett): Front; Sett foran og bak; Ikke spesifisert; Bak; Annet
ru: Совместимость стабилизатора поперечной устойчивости (передний/задний/комплект): Передний; Комплект (передний и задний); Не указано; Задний; Другое
cs: Montáž stabilizátoru (přední/zadní/sada): Přední; Přední a zadní sada; Nespecifikováno; Zadní; Jiné
vi: Lắp đặt thanh ổn định (trước/sau/bộ): Trước; Bộ trước và sau; Không xác định; Sau; Khác
fr: Configuration de la barre antiroulis (avant/arrière/kit): Avant; Kit avant et arrière; Non spécifié; Arrière; Autre
tr: Viraj denge çubuğu montajı (ön/arka/kit): Ön; Ön ve arka kit; Belirtilmemiş; Arka; Diğer
bg-BG: Съвместимост на стабилизиращата щанга (предна/задна/комплект): Предна; Комплект предна и задна; Не е посочено; Задна; Друго
ja: スタビライザーバー適合位置 (フロント/リア/キット): フロント; フロント・リアキット; 指定なし; リア; その他
es: Instalación de la barra estabilizadora (delantera/trasera/kit): Delantero; Kit delantero y trasero; No especificado; Trasero; Otro
sk-SK: Montáž stabilizačnej tyče (predná/zadná/súprava): Predný; Súprava pre prednú a zadnú nápravu; Nešpecifikované; Zadný; Iné
sl-SI: Umeščenost stabilizatorja (spredaj/zadaj/komplet): Spredaj; Komplet za spredaj in zadaj; Ni določeno; Zadaj; Drugo
zh-TW: 防傾桿適配位置 (前/後/套件): 前; 前後套件組; 未指定; 後; 其他
sv: Krängningshämmarmontering (fram/bak/sats): Fram; Kit för fram och bak; Ej specificerad; Bak; Annan
th: การติดตั้งเหล็กกันโคลง (ด้านหน้า/ด้านหลัง/ชุดอุปกรณ์): ด้านหน้า; ชุดด้านหน้าและด้านหลัง; ไม่ได้ระบุ; ด้านหลัง; อื่นๆ
el: Τοποθέτηση ράβδου ταλάντωσης (εμπρός/πίσω/κιτ): Μπροστά; Κιτ για μπροστά και πίσω; Δεν καθορίζεται; Πίσω; Άλλο
nl: Stabilisatorstang pasvorm (voor/achter/kit): Voor; Kit voor voor en achter; Niet gespecificeerd; Achter; Overig
da: Pasform for krængningsstabilisator (foran, bagpå eller sæt): Foran; Sæt til foran og bagpå; Ikke angivet; Bagpå; Andet
hr-HR: Ugradnja stabilizatora (prednji/stražnji/komplet): Prednje; Komplet za prednju i stražnju stranu; Nije navedeno; Stražnje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 防倾杆适配位置（前轴/后轴/套装）: 前置; 前后套件; 未指定; 后置; 其他
lt-LT: Stabilizatoriaus montavimo vieta (priekis / galas / rinkinys): Priekinis; Priekinio ir galinio rinkinys; Nenurodyta; Galinis; Kitas
pt-BR: Barra estabilizadora aplicação (dianteira/traseira/kit): Dianteira; Kit dianteiro e traseiro; Não especificado; Traseira; Outro
it: Montaggio della barra stabilizzatrice (anteriore/posteriore/kit): Anteriore; Kit anteriore e posteriore; Non specificato; Posteriore; Altro
en: Sway bar fitment (front/rear/kit): Front; Front and rear kit; Not specified; Rear; Other